Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.570

Official controls—Adoption.

Official controls shall be adopted by ordinance and shall further the purpose and objectives of a comprehensive plan and parts thereof.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.570. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 57.]